hr-HR: Stil pripreme tofua: Sušeni (koya); Fermentirani; U obliku čvora; Marinirani; Puding; Pjenasti (puff); Obični blok; Svileni; Kožica; Štapići; Ostalo
tr: Tofu hazırlama stili: Kurutulmuş (koya); Fermente; Düğümlü; Marineli; Puding; Puf; Normal kalıp; İpeksi; Kabuk; Çubuk; Diğer
sk-SK: Štýl prípravy tofu: Sušené (koya); Fermentované; Uzlíky; Marinované; Puding; Pufované; Klasický blok; Jemné (Silken); Koža; Tyčinky; Iné
ko: 두부 준비 형태: 건조(고야); 발효; 매듭; 양념; 푸딩; 퍼프; 일반 블록; 연두부; 두부 껍질; 스틱; 기타
nb: Forberedelsesstil for tofu: Tørket (koya); Fermentert; Knute; Marinert; Pudding; Puff; Vanlig blokk; Silketofu; Skinn; Pinne; Annet
da: Tilberedningsform for tofu: Tørret (koya); Fermenteret; Knude; Marineret; Budding; Puff; Almindelig blok; Silketofu; Skind; Stav; Andet
lt-LT: Tofu paruošimo būdas: Džiovintas („koya“); Fermentuotas; Mazgeliai; Marinuotas; Pudingas; Pūstas; Įprastas luitas; Šilkinis; Odelė; Lazdelės; Kita
es: Estilo de preparación de tofu: Deshidratado (koya); Fermentado; En nudo; Marinado; Pudín; Inflado; Bloque regular; Sedoso; Piel; En barra; Otro
it: Stile di preparazione del tofu: Essiccato (koya); Fermentato; Nodi; Marinato; Budino; Soffiato; Blocco classico; Setoso; Pelle; Bastoncino; Altro
pt-PT: Estilo de preparação do tofu: Seco (koya); Fermentado; Nó; Marinado; Pudim; Puff; Bloco regular; Sedoso; Pele; Palito; Outro
ja: 豆腐準備スタイル: 高野豆腐 (乾燥); 発酵; 結び; 味付け; プリン; パフ; ブロック (通常); 絹ごし; 湯葉; スティック; その他
zh-CN: 豆腐加工方式: 冻豆腐（高野豆腐）; 豆腐乳（发酵）; 豆腐结; 卤豆腐; 豆花; 豆腐泡; 常规块状; 嫩豆腐; 豆腐皮; 腐竹条; 其他
fr: Mode de préparation du tofu: Séché (koya); Fermenté; Nœud; Mariné; Pudding; Soufflé; Bloc régulier; Soyeux; Peau; Bâtonnet; Autre
pl: Styl przygotowania tofu: Suszone (Koya); Fermentowane; Węzełki; Marynowane; Pudding; Puszek; Zwykły blok; Jedwabiste; Skórka (Yuba); Paluszki; Inny
sl-SI: Stil priprave tofuja: Sušen (koja); Fermentiran; Vozli; Mariniran; Puding; Ocvrt (puff); Navaden blok; Svilnat; Kožica; Palčke; Drugo
cs: Styl přípravy tofu: Sušené (koya); Fermentované; Uzly; Marinované; Pudingové; Puff (smažené); Běžný blok; Hedvábné; Kůže; Tyčinky; Jiné
de: Zubereitungsart des Tofus: Getrocknet (Koya); Fermentiert; Knoten; Mariniert; Pudding; Gepufft; Normaler Block; Seidentofu; Haut; Stick; Sonstige
en: Tofu preparation style: Dried (koya); Fermented; Knot; Marinated; Pudding; Puff; Regular block; Silken; Skin; Stick; Other
ro-RO: Stil de preparare pentru tofu: Uscat (koya); Fermentat; Noduri; Marinat; Budincă; Puf; Bloc normal; Mătăsos; Pieliță; Batoane; Altele
fi: Tofun valmistustyyli: Kuivattu (koya); Fermentoitu; Solmu; Marinoitu; Vanukas; Puhvi; Tavallinen pala; Pehmeä (silken); Kuori; Tikku; Muu
el: Στυλ προετοιμασίας τόφου: Αποξηραμένο (koya); Που έχει υποστεί ζύμωση; Κόμπος; Μαριναρισμένο; Πουτίγκα; Puff; Κλασικό μπλοκ; Silken (μεταξένιο); Φλούδα; Στικ; Άλλο
zh-TW: 豆腐處理方式: 高野豆腐 (凍豆腐); 發酵; 百頁結; 醃製; 豆花; 豆卜/油豆腐; 板豆腐; 嫩豆腐; 腐皮; 腐竹; 其他
pt-BR: Estilo de preparo do tofu: Desidratado (koya); Fermentado; Nó; Marinado; Pudim; Frito; Bloco regular; Seda; Pele; Palito; Outros
sv: Typ av beredning för tofu: Torkad (koya); Fermenterad; Knut; Marinerad; Pudding; Puff; Vanligt block; Silkes; Skinn; Stavar; Övrigt
nl: Bereidingsstijl tofu: Gedroogd (koya); Gefermenteerd; Knoop; Gemarineerd; Pudding; Puff; Normaal blok; Zijdentofu; Vel; Stick; Overige
hu: Tofu elkészítési stílusa: Szárított (koya); Erjesztett; Csomó; Pácolt; Puding; Felfújt; Normál blokk; Selymes; Hártya; Pálcika; Egyéb
bg-BG: Стил на приготвяне на тофу: Сушено (коя); Ферментирало; На възли; Мариновано; Пудинг; Пуф; Стандартен блок; Копринено (Silken); Кори; На пръчици; Друго
ru: Способ приготовления тофу: Сушёный (коя-дофу); Ферментированный; Узелки; Маринованный; Пудинг; Воздушный; Обычный (брусок); Шёлковый; Пенка (юба); Палочки; Другое
vi: Phong cách chế biến đậu phụ: Sấy khô (koya); Lên men; Buộc thắt nút; Tẩm ướp; Bánh pudding; Chiên phồng; Khối thông thường; Đậu hũ non; Váng (Tàu hũ ky); Dạng que; Khác
th: วิธีการเตรียมเต้าหู้: อบแห้ง (โคยะ); หมัก; ผูกปม; หมักซอส; พุดดิ้ง; พอง; ก้อนปกติ; เนื้ออ่อน; แผ่นฟองเต้าหู้; แบบแท่ง; อื่นๆ